Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-702
Transmission lines; intersections between railroads and highways; jurisdiction of commission.

The commission shall have general supervision over any and all wires for transmitting electric current, or any other wire whatsoever, which crosses under or over any railroad track in this state at public highway crossings.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 2, p. 1422;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 114.